Washington statutes.
RCW 11.110.130

Violations—Civil action may be prosecuted.

A civil action for a violation of this chapter may be prosecuted by the attorney general or by a prosecuting attorney.

[ 1993 c 471 s 33; 1985 c 30 s 127. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 53 s 13. Formerly RCW 19.10.130.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 471: See RCW 19.09.915.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.